Mississippi, session 2026, HB701.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This act shall be known and cited as "The Fatherhood Begins at Conception Act." (2)  Any court-ordered award for a pregnant mother shall, at a minimum, cover the medical expenses of the pregnant mother during the pregnancy, the post pregnancy medical care of the mother for no less than two (2) years after the birth of the child, including any mental or dietary needs of the mother of the child that can be reasonably traced by a physician as a result of the mother having giving birth.  The award guidelines described in this section shall be a rebuttable presumption in all judicial or administrative proceedings regarding the awarding or modifying of support for mothers with unborn children out of wedlock in this state. (3)  The guidelines provided for in subsection (1) of this section apply unless the judicial or administrative body awarding the support award makes a written finding or specific finding on the record that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case. (4)  The amount of "adjusted gross income" for any father against whom the support award is ordered shall be calculated as follows: (a)  Determine gross income from all potential sources that may reasonably be expected to be available to the absent parent including, but not limited to, the following: wages and salary income; income from self-employment; income from commissions; income from investments, including dividends, interest income and income on any trust account or property; absent parent's portion of any joint income of both parents; workers' compensation, disability, unemployment, annuity and retirement benefits, including an Individual Retirement Account (IRA); any other payments made by any person, private entity, federal or state government or any unit of local government; alimony; any income earned from an interest in or from inherited property; any other form of earned income; and gross income shall exclude any monetary benefits derived from a second household, such as income of the absent parent's current spouse; (b)  Subtract the following legally mandated deductions: (i)  Federal, state and local taxes.  Contributions to the payment of taxes over and beyond the actual liability for the taxable year shall not be considered a mandatory deduction; (ii)  Social security contributions; (iii)  Retirement and disability contributions except any voluntary retirement and disability contributions; (c)  If the father is subject to an existing court order for another child or children, subtract the amount of that court-ordered support; (d)  If the father is also the parent of another child or other children residing with him, then the court may subtract an amount that it deems appropriate to account for the needs of said child or children; and (e)  Compute the total annual amount of adjusted gross income based on paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, then divide this amount by twelve (12) to obtain the monthly amount of adjusted gross income. Upon conclusion of the calculation of paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection, multiply the monthly amount of adjusted gross income by the appropriate percentage designated in subsection (1) of this section to arrive at the amount of the monthly child-support award. (5)  In cases in which the adjusted gross income as defined in this section is more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), the court shall make a written finding in the record as to whether or not the application of the guidelines established in this section is reasonable.  The court shall take into account the basic subsistence needs of the father who has a limited ability to pay. (6)  Imputation of income shall not be based upon a standard amount in lieu of fact-gathering.  In the absence of specific sufficient evidence of past earnings and employment history to use as the measure of a father's ability to pay, the recommended support obligation amount should be based on available information about the specific circumstances of the obligated parent.  This can include, but is not limited to, such factors as assets, residence, job skills, educational attainment, literacy, age, health, criminal record and other employment barriers, and record of seeking work, as well as the local job market, the availability of employers willing to hire the obligated parent, prevailing earnings level in the local community, and other relevant factors in the case. SECTION 2.  Section 93-9-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-3.  (1)  Nothing herein contained shall be construed as abridging the power and jurisdiction of the chancery courts of the State of Mississippi, exercised over the estates of minors, nor as an abridgment of the power and authority of said chancery courts or the chancellor in vacation or chancery clerk in vacation to appoint guardians for minors.  The Uniform Law on Paternity shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the laws of those states which enact it. (2)  The provisions herein shall be construed to provide authority to the chancery courts of the State of Mississippi to order the father of an unborn child out of lawful matrimony to provide support to the mother of the unborn child out of lawful matrimony who asserts the paternity of a father.  For purposes of this chapter, the term "unborn child" means a child in the mother's womb. SECTION 3.  Section 93-9-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-7.  * * *The Any father of a child * * *which is or may be born out of lawful matrimony is born out of lawful matrimony and any father of an unborn child out of lawful matrimony shall be liable to the same extent as the father of a child born * * *of in lawful matrimony, whether or not the child is born alive, for the reasonable expenses of the mother's physical and mental prenatal care, pregnancy and confinement, and for the education, necessary support and maintenance, and medical and funeral expenses of the child.  A child born out of lawful matrimony also includes a child born to a married woman by a man other than her lawful husband. SECTION 4.  Section 93-9-9, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-9.  (1)  Paternity may be determined upon the petition of the mother, or father, the child or any public authority chargeable by law with the support of the child or an unborn child; provided that such an adjudication after the death of the defendant must be made only upon clear and convincing evidence.  If paternity has been lawfully determined, lawfully asserted by the mother of an unborn child or has been acknowledged in writing according to the laws of this state, the liabilities of the noncustodial parent may be enforced in the same or other proceedings by the custodial parent, the child, or any public authority which has furnished or may furnish the reasonable expenses of pregnancy, confinement, education, necessary support and maintenance, and medical or funeral expenses for the custodial parent or the child.  The trier of fact shall receive without the need for third-party foundation testimony certified, attested or sworn documentation as evidence of (a) childbirth records; (b) cost of filing fees; (c) court costs; (d) services of process fees; (e) mailing cost; (f) genetic tests and testing fees; (g) the department's attorney's fees; (h) in cases where the state or any of its entities or divisions have provided medical services to the child or the child's mother, all costs of prenatal care, birthing, postnatal care and any other medical expenses incurred by the child or by the mother as a consequence of the mother's pregnancy or delivery; and (i) funeral expenses.  All costs and fees shall be ordered paid to the Department of Human Services in all cases successfully prosecuted with a minimum of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) in attorney's fees or an amount determined by the court without submitting an affidavit. Proceedings may be instituted at any time until such child attains the age of twenty-one (21) years unless the child has been emancipated as provided in Section 93-5-23 and Section 93-11-65.  In the event of court-determined paternity, the surname of the child shall be that of the father, unless the judgment specifies otherwise. (2)  If the alleged father in an action to determine paternity to which the Department of Human Services is a party fails to appear for a scheduled hearing after having been served with process or subsequent notice consistent with the Rules of Civil Procedure, his paternity of the child(ren) shall be established by the court if a written declaration in support of establishing paternity made under penalty of perjury to the best of her knowledge, information and belief by the mother averring the alleged father's paternity of the child has accompanied the complaint to determine paternity.  The written declaration shall constitute sufficient grounds for the court's finding of the alleged father's paternity without the necessity of the presence or testimony of the mother at the said hearing.  The court shall, upon motion by the Department of Human Services, enter a judgment of paternity.  Any person who shall willfully and knowingly file a false affidavit or who shall willfully, intentionally and knowingly file a false written declaration under penalty of perjury shall be subject to a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). (3)  Upon application of both parents to the State Board of Health and receipt by the State Board of Health of a sworn acknowledgement of paternity executed by both parents subsequent to the birth of a child born out of wedlock, the birth certificate of the child shall be amended to show such paternity if paternity is not shown on the birth certificate.  Upon request of the parents for the legitimization of a child under this section, the surname of the child shall be changed on the certificate to that of the father. (4)  (a)  A signed voluntary acknowledgment of paternity is subject to the right of any signatory to rescind the acknowledgment within the earlier of: (i)  One (1) year; or (ii)  The date of a judicial proceeding relating to the child, including a proceeding to establish a support order, in which the signatory is a party. (b)  After the expiration of the one-year period specified in subsection (4)(a)(i) of this section, a signed voluntary acknowledgment of paternity may be challenged in court only on the basis of fraud, duress or material mistake of fact, with the burden of proof upon the challenger; the legal responsibilities, including child support obligations, of any signatory arising from the acknowledgment may not be suspended during the pendency of the challenge, except for good cause shown. (c)  During the one-year time period specified in subsection (4)(a)(i) of this section, the alleged father may request genetic testing through the Department of Human Services in accordance with the provisions of Section 93-9-21. (d)  The one-year time limit, specified in subsection (4)(a)(i) of this section, for the right of the alleged father to rescind the signed voluntary acknowledgement of paternity shall be tolled from the date the alleged father files his formal application for genetic testing with the Department of Human Services until the date the test results are revealed to the alleged father by the department.  After the one-year time period has expired, not including any period of time tolled for the purpose of acquiring genetic testing through the department, the provisions of subsection (4)(b) of this section shall apply. SECTION 5.  Section 93-9-11, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-11.  The father's liabilities for past education and necessary support and maintenance and other expenses are limited to a period of * * *one (1) year next three (3) years preceding the commencement of an action. SECTION 6.  Section 93-9-13, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-13.  The obligation of the estate of the father for liabilities under Section 93-9-7 * * * is shall not be limited to amounts accrued prior to his death.  However, in order to hold the estate of the father liable under Section 93-9-7, the action must be filed within one (1) year after the death of the father or within ninety (90) days after the first publication of notice to creditors to present their claims, whichever is less. SECTION 7.  Section 93-9-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-19.  If the issue of paternity is raised in an action commenced during the pregnancy of the mother, the trial shall * * * not, without the consent of the alleged father, be held until after the birth or miscarriage, but during such delay testimony may be perpetuated according to the laws of this state be held to determine expense of the mother and father. SECTION 8.  Section 93-9-28, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-28.  (1)  The Mississippi State Department of Health in cooperation with the Mississippi Department of Human Services shall develop a form and procedure which may be used to secure a voluntary acknowledgement of paternity from the mother and father of any unborn child or child born out of wedlock in Mississippi.  The form shall clearly state on its face that the execution of the acknowledgement of paternity shall result in the same legal effect as if the father and mother had been married at the time of the birth of the child.  The form shall also clearly indicate the right of the alleged father to request genetic testing through the Department of Human Services within the one-year time period specified in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section and shall state the adverse effects and ramifications of not availing himself of this one-time opportunity to definitively establish the paternity of the child.  When such form has been completed according to the established procedure and the signatures of both the mother and father have been notarized, then such voluntary acknowledgement shall constitute a full determination of the legal parentage of the child.  The completed voluntary acknowledgement of paternity shall be filed with the Bureau of Vital Statistics of the Mississippi State Department of Health.  The name of the father shall be entered on the certificate of birth upon receipt of the completed voluntary acknowledgement. (2)  (a)  A signed voluntary acknowledgment of paternity is subject to the right of any signatory to rescind the acknowledgment within the earlier of: (i)  One (1) year; or (ii)  The date of a judicial proceeding relating to the child, including a proceeding to establish a support order, in which the signatory is a party. (b)  After the expiration of the one-year period specified in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, a signed voluntary acknowledgment of paternity may be challenged in court only on the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake of fact, with the burden of proof upon the challenger; the legal responsibilities, including child support obligations, of any signatory arising from the acknowledgment may not be suspended during the pendency of the challenge, except for good cause shown. (c)  During the one-year time period specified in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, the alleged father may request genetic testing through the Department of Human Services in accordance with the provisions of Section 93-9-21. (d)  The one-year time limit, specified in subsection (2)(a)(i) of this section, for the right of the alleged father to rescind the signed voluntary acknowledgement of paternity shall be tolled from the date the alleged father files his formal application for genetic testing with the Department of Human Services until the date the test results are revealed to the alleged father by the department.  After the one-year time period has expired, not including any period of time tolled for the purpose of acquiring genetic testing through the department, the provisions of subsection (2)(b) of this section shall apply. (3)  The Mississippi State Department of Health and the Mississippi Department of Human Services shall cooperate to establish procedures to facilitate the voluntary acknowledgement of paternity by both father and mother at the time of the birth of any child born out of wedlock.  Such procedures shall establish responsibilities for each of the departments and for hospitals, birthing centers, midwives, and/or other birth attendants to seek and report voluntary acknowledgements of paternity. In establishing such procedures, the departments shall provide for obtaining the social security account numbers of both the father and mother on voluntary acknowledgements. (4)  Upon the birth of a child out of wedlock, the hospital, birthing center, midwife or other birth attendant shall provide an opportunity for the child's mother and natural father to complete an acknowledgement of paternity by giving the mother and natural father the appropriate forms and information developed through the procedures established in subsection (3).  The hospital, birthing center, midwife or other birth attendant shall be responsible for providing printed information, and audio visual material if available, related to the acknowledgement of paternity, and shall be required to provide notary services needed for the completion of acknowledgements of paternity.  The information described above shall be provided to the mother and natural father, if present and identifiable, within twenty-four (24) hours of birth or before the mother is released.  Such information, including forms, brochures, pamphlets, video tapes and other media, shall be provided at no cost to the hospital, birthing center or midwife by the Mississippi State Department of Health, the Department of Human Services or other appropriate agency. SECTION 9.  Section 93-9-29, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-29.  (1)  If the finding be against the defendant, the court shall make an order of filiation, declaring paternity and for the support and education of the child, and for the support and expenses of the pregnant mother, if applicable. (2)  The order of filiation shall specify the sum to be paid weekly or otherwise.  In addition to providing for the support and education, the order shall also provide for the funeral expenses if the child has died; for the support of the child prior to the making of the order of filiation; support of the mother and unborn child and such other expenses as the court may deem proper.  In the event the defendant has health insurance available to him through an employer or organization that may extend benefits to the mother of the unborn child or dependents of such defendant, the order of filiation may require the defendant to exercise the option of additional coverage in favor of the child he is legally responsible to support. (3)  The court may require the payment to be made to the mother, or to some person or corporation to be designated by the court as trustee, but if the child is or is likely to become a public charge on a county or the state, the public welfare agent of that county shall be made the trustee.  The payment shall be directed to be made to a trustee if the mother does not reside within the jurisdiction of the court. The trustee shall report to the court annually, or oftener as directed by the court, the amounts received and paid over. SECTION 10.  Section 93-9-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-9-35.  (1)  If a mother of a natural child be possessed of property and shall fail to support and educate her child, the court having jurisdiction, on the application of the guardian or next friend of the child or, if the child shall receive Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) benefits or other financial assistance, of the county human services agent or youth counselor, may examine into the matter and after a hearing may make an order charging the mother with the payment of money weekly or otherwise for the support and education of the child. (2)  The court may require the mother to give security, by bond or other security, with sufficient sureties approved by the court, for the payment of the order.  In default of such security, when required, the court may commit her to jail, or put her on probation.  At any time within one (1) year she may be discharged from jail, but her liability to pay the judgment shall not be thereby affected. (3)  Nothing in this section shall be deemed to relieve the father from liability for support and education of the child or the support of the mother of the unborn child in accordance with the provisions of Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49. SECTION 11.  Section 93-11-65, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-11-65.  (1)  (a)  In addition to the right to proceed under Section 93-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, and in addition to the remedy of habeas corpus in proper cases, and other existing remedies, the chancery court of the proper county shall have jurisdiction to entertain suits for the custody, care, support and maintenance of minor children, the care, support and medical expenses of the mother of the unborn child and to hear and determine all such matters, and shall, if need be, require bond, sureties or other guarantee to secure any order for periodic payments for the maintenance or support of a child.  In the event a legally responsible parent has health insurance available to him or her through an employer or organization that may extend benefits to the dependents of such parent, any order of support issued against such parent may require him or her to exercise the option of additional coverage in favor of such children as he or she is legally responsible to support.  Proceedings may be brought by or against a resident or nonresident of the State of Mississippi, whether or not having the actual custody of minor children, for the purpose of judicially determining the legal custody of a child.  All actions herein authorized may be brought in the county where the child is actually residing, or in the county of the residence of the party who has actual custody, or of the residence of the defendant.  Process shall be had upon the parties as provided by law for process in person or by publication, if they be nonresidents of the state or residents of another jurisdiction or are not found therein after diligent search and inquiry or are unknown after diligent search and inquiry; provided that the court or chancellor in vacation may fix a date in termtime or in vacation to which process may be returnable and shall have power to proceed in termtime or vacation.  Provided, however, that if the court shall find that both parties are fit and proper persons to have custody of the children, and that either party is able to adequately provide for the care and maintenance of the children, the chancellor may consider the preference of a child of twelve (12) years of age or older as to the parent with whom the child would prefer to live in determining what would be in the best interest and welfare of the child.  The chancellor shall place on the record the reason or reasons for which the award of custody was made and explain in detail why the wishes of any child were or were not honored. (b)  An order of child support shall specify the sum to be paid weekly or otherwise.  In addition to providing for support and education, the order shall also provide for the support of the child prior to the making of the order for child support, and such other expenses as the court may deem proper. (c)  The court may require the payment to be made to the custodial parent, or to some person or corporation to be designated by the court as trustee, but if the child or custodial parent is receiving public assistance, the Department of Human Services shall be made the trustee. (d)  The noncustodial parent's liabilities for past education and necessary support and maintenance and other expenses are limited to a period of one (1) year next preceding the commencement of an action. (2)  Provided further, that where the proof shows that both parents have separate incomes or estates, the court may require that each parent contribute to the support and maintenance of the children in proportion to the relative financial ability of each. (3)  Whenever the court has ordered a party to make periodic payments for the maintenance or support of a child, but no bond, sureties or other guarantee has been required to secure such payments, and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, the court may, upon petition of the person to whom such payments are owing, or such person's legal representative, enter an order requiring that bond, sureties or other security be given by the person obligated to make such payments, the amount and sufficiency of which shall be approved by the court.  The obligor shall, as in other civil actions, be served with process and shall be entitled to a hearing in such case. (4)  When a charge of abuse or neglect of a child first arises in the course of a custody or maintenance action pending in the chancery court pursuant to this section, the chancery court may proceed with the investigation, hearing and determination of such abuse or neglect charge as a part of its hearing and determination of the custody or maintenance issue as between the parents, as provided in Section 43-21-151, notwithstanding the other provisions of the Youth Court Law.  The proceedings in chancery court on the abuse or neglect charge shall be confidential in the same manner as provided in youth court proceedings, and the chancery court shall appoint a guardian ad litem in such cases, as provided under Section 43-21-121 for youth court proceedings, who shall be an attorney.  In determining whether any portion of a guardian ad litem's fee shall be assessed against any party or parties as a cost of court for reimbursement to the county, the court shall consider each party's individual ability to pay.  Unless the chancery court's jurisdiction has been terminated, all disposition orders in such cases for placement with the Department of Human Services shall be reviewed by the court or designated authority at least annually to determine if continued placement with the department is in the best interest of the child or the public. (5)  Each party to a paternity or child support proceeding shall notify the other within five (5) days after any change of address.  In addition, the noncustodial and custodial parent shall file and update, with the court and with the state case registry, information on that party's location and identity, including social security number, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, photograph, driver's license number, and name, address and telephone number of the party's employer.  This information shall be required upon entry of an order or within five (5) days of a change of address. (6)  In any case subsequently enforced by the Department of Human Services pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, the court shall have continuing jurisdiction. (7)  In any subsequent child support enforcement action between the parties, upon sufficient showing that diligent effort has been made to ascertain the location of a party, due process requirements for notice and service of process shall be deemed to be met with respect to the party upon delivery of written notice to the most recent residential or employer address filed with the state case registry. (8)  (a)  The duty of support of a child terminates upon the emancipation of the child.  Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment, emancipation shall occur when the child: (i)  Attains the age of twenty-one (21) years, or (ii)  Marries, or (iii)  Joins the military and serves on a full-time basis, or (iv)  Is convicted of a felony and is sentenced to incarceration of two (2) or more years for committing such felony; * * *or (b)  Unless otherwise provided for in the underlying child support judgment, the court may determine that emancipation has occurred and no other support obligation exists when the child: (i)  Discontinues full-time enrollment in school having attained the age of eighteen (18) years, unless the child is disabled, or (ii)  Voluntarily moves from the home of the custodial parent or guardian, establishes independent living arrangements, obtains full-time employment and discontinues educational endeavors prior to attaining the age of twenty-one (21) years, or (iii)  Cohabits with another person without the approval of the parent obligated to pay support; * * *and (c)  The duty of support of a child who is incarcerated but not emancipated shall be suspended for the period of the child's incarceration. (9)  A determination of emancipation does not terminate any obligation of the noncustodial parent to satisfy arrearage existing as of the date of emancipation; the total amount of periodic support due prior to the emancipation plus any periodic amounts ordered paid toward the arrearage shall continue to be owed until satisfaction of the arrearage in full, in addition to the right of the person for whom the obligation is owed to execute for collection as may be provided by law. (10)  Upon motion of a party requesting temporary child support pending a determination of parentage, temporary support shall be ordered if there is clear and convincing evidence of paternity on the basis of genetic tests or other evidence, unless the court makes written findings of fact on the record that the award of temporary support would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case. (11)  Custody and visitation upon military temporary duty, deployment or mobilization shall be governed by Section 93-5-34. SECTION 12.  Section 93-11-71, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-11-71.  (1)  Whenever a court orders any person to make periodic payments of a sum certain for the maintenance or support of a child, or the care and expenses of the mother of an unborn child and whenever such payments as have become due remain unpaid for a period of at least thirty (30) days, a judgment by operation of law shall arise against the obligor in an amount equal to all payments that are then due and owing. (a)  A judgment arising under this section shall have the same effect and be fully enforceable as any other judgment entered in this state.  A judicial or administrative action to enforce the judgment may be begun at any time; and (b)  Such judgments arising in other states by operation of law shall be given full faith and credit in this state. (2)  Any judgment arising under the provisions of this section shall operate as a lien upon all the property of the judgment debtor, both real and personal, which lien shall be perfected as to third parties without actual notice thereof only upon enrollment on the judgment roll.  The department or attorney representing the party to whom support is owed shall furnish an abstract of the judgment for periodic payments for the maintenance and support of a child, along with sworn documentation of the delinquent child support, to the circuit clerk of the county where the judgment is rendered, and it shall be the duty of the circuit clerk to enroll the judgment on the judgment roll.  Liens arising under the provisions of this section may be executed upon and enforced in the same manner and to the same extent as any other judgment. (3)  Notwithstanding the provisions in subsection (2) of this section, any judgment arising under the provisions of this section shall subject the following assets to interception or seizure without regard to the entry of the judgment on the judgment roll of the situs district or jurisdiction and such assets shall apply to all child support owed including all arrears: (a)  Periodic or lump-sum payments from a federal, state or local agency, including unemployment compensation, workers' compensation and other benefits; (b)  Winnings from lotteries and gaming winnings that are received in periodic payments made over a period in excess of thirty (30) days; (c)  Assets held in financial institutions; (d)  Settlements and awards resulting from civil actions; (e)  Public and private retirement funds, only to the extent that the obligor is qualified to receive and receives a lump-sum or periodic distribution from the funds; (f)  Lump-sum payments as defined in Section 93-11-101; and (g)  Unclaimed property as described in Section 89-12-1 et seq. (4)  Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections (1) and (2) of this section, upon disestablishment of paternity granted pursuant to Section 93-9-10 and a finding of clear and convincing evidence including negative DNA testing that the obligor is not the biological father of the child or children for whom support has been ordered, the court shall disestablish paternity and may forgive any child support arrears of the obligor for the child or children determined by the court not to be the biological child or children of the obligor, if the court makes a written finding that, based on the totality of the circumstances, the forgiveness of the arrears is equitable under the circumstances. (5)  In any case in which a child receives assistance from block grants for Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), and the obligor owes past-due child support, the obligor, if not incapacitated, may be required by the court to participate in any work programs offered by any state agency. (6)  A parent who receives social security disability insurance payments who is liable for a child support arrearage and whose disability insurance benefits provide for the payment of past due disability insurance benefits for the support of the minor child or children for whom the parent owes a child support arrearage shall receive credit toward the arrearage for the payment or payments for the benefit of the minor child or children if the arrearage accrued after the date of disability onset as determined by the Social Security Administration. SECTION 13.  Section 93-11-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-11-101.  As used in Sections 93-11-101 through 93-11-119, the following words shall have the meaning ascribed to them herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Order for support" means any order of the chancery, circuit, county or family court, which provides for periodic payment of funds for the support of a child, or for periodic payment of funds for the support of the mother of the unborn child, whether temporary or final, and includes any such order which provides for: (i)  Modification or resumption of, or payment of arrearage accrued under, a previously existing order; or (ii)  Reimbursement of support. "Order for support" shall also mean: (i)  An order for support and maintenance of a spouse if a minor child is living with such spouse; * * *or (ii)  In actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party, an order for support and maintenance of a spouse if a minor child is living with such spouse and such maintenance is collected in conjunction with child support * * *.; or (iii)  An order for support of the mother during and after the pregnancy, which may include mental, physical and dietary health expenses. (b)  "Court" means the court that enters an order for withholding pursuant to Section 93-11-103(1). (c)  "Clerk of the court" means the clerk of the court that enters an order for withholding pursuant to Section 93-11-103(1). (d)  "Arrearage" means the total amount of unpaid support obligations. (e)  "Delinquency" means any payments that are ordered by any court to be paid by a noncustodial parent for the support of a child that have remained unpaid for at least thirty (30) days after payment is due.  Delinquency shall also include payments that are ordered by any court to be paid for maintenance of a spouse in cases in which the department is collecting such support in conjunction with child support.  "Delinquency" shall be synonymous with "overdue support." (f)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Human Services. (g)  "Employer" means a person who has control of the payment of income to an individual. (h)  "Income" means any form of periodic payment to an individual, regardless of source, including, but not limited to:  wages, salary, commission, compensation as an independent contractor, workers' compensation, disability, annuity and retirement benefits, and any other payments made by any person, private entity, federal or state government or any unit of local government, notwithstanding any other provisions of state or local law which limit or exempt income or the amount or percentage of income that can be withheld; provided, however, that income excludes: (i)  Any amounts required by law to be withheld, other than creditor claims, including, but not limited to, federal, state and local taxes, social security and other retirement and disability contributions; (ii)  Any amounts exempted by federal law; (iii)  Public assistance payments; and (iv)  Unemployment insurance benefits except as provided by law. (i)  "Obligor" means the individual who owes a duty to make payments under an order for support. (j)  "Obligee" means: (i)  An individual to whom a duty of support is or is alleged to be owed or in whose favor a support order has been issued or a judgment determining parentage has been rendered; (ii)  A state or political subdivision to which the rights under a duty of support or support order have been assigned or which independent claims based on financial assistance provided to an individual obligee; or (iii)  An individual seeking a judgment determining parentage of the individual's child. (k)  "Payor" means any payor of income to an obligor. (l)  "Lump-sum payment" means any form of income paid to an individual at other than regular intervals or a payment made upon a particular occasion regardless of frequency that is dependent upon meeting a condition precedent, including, but not limited to, the performance of a contract, commission paid outside of and in addition to a person's regular pay cycle, the satisfaction of a job performance standard or quota, the receipt of a seasonal or occasional bonus or incentive payment, the liquidation of unused sick or vacation pay or leave, the settlement of a claim, an amount paid as severance pay, or an award for length of service.  "Lump-sum payment" shall not include liens under Section 71-3-129. SECTION 14.  Section 93-11-153, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 93-11-153.  As used in Sections 93-11-151 through 93-11-163, the following words and terms shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Licensing entity" or "entity" means any entity specified in Title 73, Professions and Vocations, of the Mississippi Code, and includes the Mississippi Department of Public Safety with respect to driver's licenses, the Mississippi * * *State Tax Commission Department of Revenue with respect to licenses for the sale of alcoholic beverages and other licenses or registration authorizing a person to engage in a business, the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks with respect to hunting and fishing licenses, and any other state agency that issues a license authorizing a person to engage in a business, occupation or profession.  For the purposes of this article, the Supreme Court shall be considered to be the licensing entity for attorneys. (b)  "License" means a license, certificate, permit, credential, registration, or any other authorization issued by a licensing entity that allows a person to engage in a business, occupation or profession, to operate a motor vehicle, to sell alcoholic beverages, or to hunt and fish. (c)  "Licensee" means any person holding a license issued by a licensing entity. (d)  "Order for support" means any judgment or order that provides for payments of a sum certain for the support of a child, the mother of an unborn child, whether it is temporary or final, and includes, but is not limited to, an order for reimbursement for public assistance or an order for making periodic payments on a support arrearage, or a sum certain due for a support arrearage. (e)  "Out of compliance with an order for support" means that the obligor is at least thirty (30) days in arrears or delinquent in making payments in full for current support, or in making periodic payments on a support arrearage. (f)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Human Services. (g)  "Division" means the division within the department that is charged with the state administration of Title IV-D of the Social Security Act. (h)  "Delinquency" means any payments of a sum certain ordered by any court to be paid by a noncustodial parent for the support of a child that have remained unpaid for at least thirty (30) days after payment is due.  Delinquency shall also include payments of a sum certain ordered by any court to be paid for maintenance of a spouse that have remained unpaid for at least thirty (30) days. SECTION 15.  Section 43-19-31, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-19-31.  The Department of Human Services is hereby authorized and empowered to establish a single and separate Child Support Unit for the following purposes: (a)  To develop and implement a nonsupport and paternity program and institute proceedings in the name of the Department of Human Services or in the name of the recipient in any court of competent jurisdiction in any county where the mother of the child resides or is found, in the county where the father resides or is found, or in the county where the child resides or is found; (b)  To secure and collect support by any method authorized under state law and establish paternity for any pregnant woman, a child or children receiving aid from the department any form of public assistance, including, but not limited to, medical assistance, foster care, food stamps, TANF, or any other program under the federal Social Security Act, from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support who has either failed or refused to provide support, deserted, neglected or abandoned the child or children, including cooperating with other states in establishing paternity, locating absent parents and securing compliance with court orders for support of Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) children; the department may petition the court for the inclusion of health insurance as part of any child support order on behalf of any child receiving aid from the department unless good cause for noncooperation, as defined by the Social Security Act or the Mississippi Department of Human Services, is established.  Unless notified to the contrary, whenever a child or children for whom child support services have been provided ceases to receive public assistance, the department will continue to provide services and establish paternity, secure and collect such support payments from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support in accordance with the standards prescribed pursuant to the federal Social Security Act; (c)  To accept applications for child support enforcement services to establish paternity, secure and collect support from any proper party or person as defined by Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act notwithstanding the fact that the child or children do not currently receive or have never received public assistance. The department shall have the authority to secure and collect support by any method authorized under state law and establish paternity for any child or children on behalf of a recipient of child support services, including individuals who do not currently receive or have never received public assistance from a parent or any other person legally liable for such support who has either failed or refused to provide support, deserted, neglected or abandoned the child or children, including cooperating with other states in establishing paternity, locating absent parents and securing compliance with court orders for support; the department may petition the court for the inclusion of health insurance as part of any child support order on behalf of such recipients of child support services.  The proceeds of any collections resulting from such application shall be distributed in accordance with the standards prescribed in the federal Social Security Act; (d)  The department shall seek to recover from the individual who owes a support obligation to any individual who is a recipient of Title IV-D services as set forth in paragraph (b) or (c) on whose behalf the department is providing services, upon judicial proceedings conducted thereon after advance notice to such obligor, reasonable attorney's fees and court costs, in excess of any administrative fees collected and in excess of amounts of current support owed by the obligor, which the department incurs in recovering and collecting the support obligation, such costs and fees as the department recovers to be deposited in the Special Fund of the Mississippi Department of Human Services which is hereby established for the pursuit and collection of child support; (e)  To initiate contempt of court proceedings or any other remedial proceedings necessary to enforce (i) any order or decree of court relating to child support, and (ii) any order or decree of court relating to the maintenance and/or alimony of a parent where support collection services on his or her child's behalf are being provided by the department; (f)  To secure and collect by any method authorized under state law any maintenance and/or alimony on behalf of a parent whose child or children's support is being collected by the department.  The department shall collect only such maintenance and/or alimony as is ordered or decreed by the court, and only in the event that the minor child and parent to whom such maintenance and/or alimony has been ordered are living in the same household; (g)  To obtain restitution of monies expended for public assistance from a parent or any other person legally liable for the support of any child or children receiving aid from the department; said action for restitution shall arise from the payment of public assistance for the dependent child or children and shall be for the amount of the public assistance paid.  Said  action for restitution shall not arise against the parent or other person legally responsible who receives public assistance for the benefit of any dependent child or children.  When a court order of support has been issued, the amount recoverable shall be limited to the amount of the court order; (h)  Setting off against a debtor's income tax refund or rebate any debt which is in the form of a liquidated sum due and owing for the care, support or maintenance of a child; (i)  To have full responsibility in the aforementioned cases for initiating actions under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act and for responding to the actions of other jurisdictions under said law when Mississippi is the responding state; however, this shall not impair private litigants' rights to proceed under any applicable interstate enforcement mechanisms; (j)  To enter into contracts for the purpose of performing any test which the department may, from time to time, require; (k)  To maintain a Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit to which all payments required by withholding orders and orders for support in all actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party shall be forwarded, and from which child support payments ordered by the court in actions to which the Department of Human Services is a party shall be disbursed to the custodial parent or other such party as may be designated by the court order.  The Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit shall be operated by the Department of Human Services or any financial institution having operations and qualified to do business in Mississippi, whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation.  The department shall conduct cost-benefit analyses to determine and utilize the more cost efficient manner of operating the unit; (l)  To maintain a Mississippi Department of Human Services Case Registry containing records with respect to: (i)  Each case in which services are being provided by the department under this section; (ii)  Each support order established or modified in Mississippi on or after October 1, 1998; and (iii)  The Administrative Office of Courts, as established by Section 9-21-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, in consultation with the Mississippi Department of Human Services, shall devise, promulgate and require the use of a Uniform Child Support Order Tracking System. 1. Information collected from case filing forms shall be furnished to the Mississippi Department of Human Services, Division of Child Support Enforcement, in order that compliance with court-ordered obligations of support may be tracked with specificity throughout the duration of said obligations and any subsequent proceedings. 2.  Such tracking system shall include:  a. the names, residential and mailing addresses, telephone numbers, Social Security numbers, driver's license numbers and dates of birth of each child and parent named in or subject to the court order; b. the court cause number of the action; c. name, address and telephone number of employer; d. any restraining or protective order indicating domestic violence; and e. any other information which may be used for the purpose of identifying any person named in or subject to the order or for the purposes of establishing, enforcing or modifying a child support order; (m)  To take administrative actions relating to genetic testing, determine paternity, establish child support orders, modification of child support orders, income withholding, liens and subpoenas without the necessity of obtaining an order from any judicial or other administrative tribunal with respect to cases initiated or enforced by the department pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act; (n)  To have the authority to use high-volume automated administrative enforcement in interstate cases to the same extent as used for intrastate cases, in response to a request made by another state to enforce support orders; (o)  To provide any child support enforcement or other service as may be required by the United States of America, Department of Health and Human Services, Family Support Administration, Office of Child Support Enforcement or their successor pursuant to federal law or regulation; and (p)  To collaborate with the Office of the State Treasurer in order to identify persons presumed to have unclaimed property and intercept eligible unclaimed property to satisfy, fully or partially, the person's child support arrearage. SECTION 16.  Section 43-19-33, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-19-33.  (1)  In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to obtain support for a dependent child from the responsible parent, a written stipulated agreement to support * * *said the child and/or the pregnant mother of an unborn child by periodic payments executed by the responsible parent when acknowledged before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of the court having jurisdiction over such matters shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of said agreement as an order of support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases. (2)  In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to establish paternity, a written admission of paternity containing a stipulated agreement of support executed by the putative father of the dependent child, when accompanied by a written declaration in support of establishing paternity provided under penalty of perjury to the best of her knowledge, information and belief by the mother of the dependent child, when acknowledged by the putative father before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of the court having jurisdiction over such matters, shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of said agreement, as an order of filiation and support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases. (3)  At any time after filing with the court having continuing jurisdiction of such matters of an acknowledgment of paternity in which a provision of support has not been entered, upon notice the defendant shall be required to appear in court at any time and place named therein, to show cause, if any he can, why the court should not enter an order for the support of the child by periodic payments. The order may include provisions for reimbursement for medical expenses incident to the pregnancy and the birth of the child, accrued maintenance and reasonable expenses of the action under this subsection on the acknowledgment of paternity previously filed with said court.  Notice by the department to the defendant shall be given by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested at his last known mailing address and without the requirement of a summons being issued, and shall be deemed complete as of the date of delivery as evidenced by the return receipt.  The required notice may also be delivered by personal service in accordance with Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure insofar as service of an administrative order or notice is concerned.  Provided, that in the case of a child who, upon reaching the age of twenty-one (21) years, is mentally or physically incapable of self-support, the putative father shall not be relieved of the duty of support unless said child is a long-term patient in a facility owned or operated by the State of Mississippi.  The prior judgment as to paternity shall be res judicata as to that issue and shall not be reconsidered by the court. (4)  Such agreements of support, acknowledgments, declarations and affirmations of paternity and support shall be binding on the person executing the same whether he be an adult or a minor and may include provisions for the reimbursement of medical expenses incident to the pregnancy and birth of the child, accrued maintenance and reasonable expenses of any action previously filed before the court. (5)  In lieu of legal proceedings instituted to enforce an order for support, a written stipulated agreement for the provision of periodic payments towards an arrearage executed by the defendant when acknowledged before a clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters or a notary public and filed with and approved by the judge of the court having jurisdiction over such matters shall have the same force and effect, retroactively and prospectively, in accordance with the terms of said agreement as a judgment for overdue support entered by the court, and shall be enforceable and subject to modification in the same manner as is provided by law for orders of the court in such cases. (6)  All agreements entered into under the provisions as set forth hereinabove shall be filed by the clerk of the court having jurisdiction over such matters in the county in which they are entered and filing fees shall be taxed to the responsible parent. SECTION 17.  Section 43-19-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-19-35.  (1)  By currently or previously accepting public assistance or making application for child support services for and on behalf of a child or children or as a result of being pregnant with an unborn child, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the State Department of Human Services of any and all rights and interests in any cause of action, past, present or future, that said recipient or the children may have against any parent failing to provide for the support and maintenance of said minor child or children; said department shall be subrogated to any and all rights, title and interest the recipient or the children may have against any and all property belonging to the absent or nonsupporting parent in the enforcement of any claim for child or spousal support, whether liquidated through court order or not.  The recipient of Title IV-D services shall also be deemed, without the necessity of signing any document, to have appointed the State Department of Human Services to act in his or her, as well as the children's, name, place, and stead to perform the specific act of instituting suit to establish paternity or secure support, collecting any and all amounts due and owing for child or spousal support or any other service as required or permitted under Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, and endorsing any and all drafts, checks, money orders or other negotiable instruments representing child or spousal support payments which are received on behalf of the recipient or the children, and retaining any portion thereof permitted under federal and state statutes as reimbursement for public assistance monies previously paid to the recipient or children. (2)  Court orders of support for any child * * *or , children or mother of an unborn child receiving services through Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act shall be amended, by operation of law, and without the necessity of a motion by the Child Support Unit and a hearing thereon to provide that the payment of support shall be directed by the absent parent to the Mississippi Department of Human Services Central Receipting and Disbursement Unit as provided in Section 43-19-37 and not to the recipient. The absent parent shall be notified of such amendment prior to it taking effect. (3)  Any attorney authorized by the state to initiate any action pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act, including, but not limited to, any action initiated pursuant to Sections 43-19-31 et seq. and 93-25-1 et seq. shall be deemed to represent the interest of the State Department of Human Services exclusively; no attorney-client relationship shall exist between said attorney and any recipient of services pursuant to Title IV-D of the federal Social Security Act for and on behalf of a child or children, regardless of the name in which the legal proceedings are initiated.  Said attorney representing the state in a Title IV-D case is only authorized to appear and prosecute and/or defend issues of support and cannot in a Title IV-D case address or provide representation to the Title IV-D recipient on any other ancillary issues raised or presented in that action. (4)  Said assignment to the State Department of Human Services shall be free of any legal or equitable defense to the payment of child support that may accrue to any person legally liable for the support of any child or children receiving aid from the State Department of Human Services, as a result of the conduct of the person who is accepting public assistance for and on behalf of said child or children. SECTION 18.  Section 43-19-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-19-101.  (1)  The following child-support award guidelines shall be a rebuttable presumption in all judicial or administrative proceedings regarding the awarding or modifying of child-support awards in this state: Number Of Children       Percentage Of Adjusted Gross Income Due Support           That Should Be Awarded For Support 1                              14% 2                              20% 3                              22% 4                              24% 5 or more                          26% (2)  The guidelines provided for in subsection (1) of this section apply unless the judicial or administrative body awarding or modifying the child-support award makes a written finding or specific finding on the record that the application of the guidelines would be unjust or inappropriate in a particular case as determined under the criteria specified in Section 43-19-103. (3)  The amount of "adjusted gross income" as that term is used in subsection (1) of this section shall be calculated as follows: (a)  Determine gross income from all potential sources that may reasonably be expected to be available to the absent parent including, but not limited to, the following: wages and salary income; income from self-employment; income from commissions; income from investments, including dividends, interest income and income on any trust account or property; absent parent's portion of any joint income of both parents; workers' compensation, disability, unemployment, annuity and retirement benefits, including an Individual Retirement Account (IRA); any other payments made by any person, private entity, federal or state government or any unit of local government; alimony; any income earned from an interest in or from inherited property; any other form of earned income; and gross income shall exclude any monetary benefits derived from a second household, such as income of the absent parent's current spouse; (b)  Subtract the following legally mandated deductions: (i)  Federal, state and local taxes.  Contributions to the payment of taxes over and beyond the actual liability for the taxable year shall not be considered a mandatory deduction; (ii)  Social security contributions; (iii)  Retirement and disability contributions except any voluntary retirement and disability contributions; (c)  If the obligated parent is subject to an existing court order for another child or children, subtract the amount of that court-ordered support; (d)  If the absent parent is also the parent of another child or other children residing with him, then the court may subtract an amount that it deems appropriate to account for the needs of said child or children; (e)  Compute the total annual amount of adjusted gross income based on paragraphs (a) through (d) of this subsection, then divide this amount by twelve (12) to obtain the monthly amount of adjusted gross income. Upon conclusion of the calculation of paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection, multiply the monthly amount of adjusted gross income by the appropriate percentage designated in subsection (1) of this section to arrive at the amount of the monthly child-support award. (4)  In cases in which the adjusted gross income as defined in this section is more than One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00) or less than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), the court shall make a written finding in the record as to whether or not the application of the guidelines established in this section is reasonable.  The court shall take into account the basic subsistence needs of the obligated parent who has a limited ability to pay. (5)  Imputation of income shall not be based upon a standard amount in lieu of fact-gathering.  In the absence of specific sufficient evidence of past earnings and employment history to use as the measure of an obligated parent's ability to pay, the recommended child-support obligation amount should be based on available information about the specific circumstances of the obligated parent.  This can include, but is not limited to, such factors as assets, residence, job skills, educational attainment, literacy, age, health, criminal record and other employment barriers, and record of seeking work, as well as the local job market, the availability of employers willing to hire the obligated parent, prevailing earnings level in the local community, and other relevant factors in the case. (6)  Unless extended or waived, the Department of Human Services shall review the appropriateness of these guidelines beginning January 1, 1994, and every four (4) years thereafter and report its findings to the Legislature no later than the first day of the regular legislative session of that year.  The Legislature shall thereafter amend these guidelines when it finds that amendment is necessary to ensure that equitable support is being awarded in all cases involving the support of minor children. (7)  All orders involving support of minor children, as a matter of law, shall include reasonable medical support.  Notice to the obligated parent's employer that medical support has been ordered shall be on a form as prescribed by the Department of Human Services.  In any case in which the support of any child is involved, the court shall make the following findings either on the record or in the judgment: (a)  The availability to all parties of health insurance coverage for the child(ren); (b)  The cost of health insurance coverage to all parties. The court shall then make appropriate provisions in the judgment for the provision of health insurance coverage for the child(ren) and/or the pregnant mother of the unborn child in the manner that is in the best interests of the child(ren) or unborn child.  If the court requires the custodial parent to obtain the coverage then its cost shall be taken into account in establishing the child-support award.  If the court determines that health insurance coverage is not available to any party or that it is not available to either party at a cost that is reasonable as compared to the income of the parties, then the court shall make specific findings as to such either on the record or in the judgment.  In that event, the court shall make appropriate provisions in the judgment for the payment of medical expenses of the child(ren) in the absence of health insurance coverage. SECTION 19.  Section 93-9-15, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 93-9-15.  The county court, the circuit court, or the chancery court has jurisdiction of an action under Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49, and all remedies for the enforcement of orders awarding custody or for expenses of pregnancy and confinement for a wife, or for education, necessary support and maintenance, or funeral expenses for legitimate children shall apply.  The defendant must defend the cause in whichever court the action is commenced.  The court has continuing jurisdiction to modify or revoke an order and to increase or decrease amounts fixed by order for future education and necessary support and maintenance.  All remedies under the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, and amendments thereto, are available for enforcement of duties of support and maintenance under Sections 93-9-1 through 93-9-49.  Parties to an action to establish paternity shall not be entitled to a jury trial.  The court may also order the father to reimburse Medicaid for expenses of the pregnancy and confinement of the mother. SECTION 20.  Section 93-9-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 93-9-21.  (1)  (a)  In all cases brought pursuant to Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, upon written declarations of the mother, putative father, or the Department of Human Services made under penalty of perjury to the best of his or her knowledge, information and belief alleging paternity, the department may issue an administrative order for paternity testing which requires the mother, putative father and minor child to submit themselves for paternity testing.  The department shall send the putative father a copy of the Administrative Order and a Notice for Genetic Testing which shall include the date, time and place for collection of the putative father's genetic sample.  The department shall also send the putative father a Notice and Complaint to Establish Paternity which shall specify the date and time certain of the court hearing by certified mail, restricted delivery, return receipt requested.  Notice shall be deemed complete as of the date of delivery as evidenced by the return receipt.  The required notice may also be delivered by personal service upon the putative father in accordance with Rule 4 of the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure insofar as service of an administrative order or notice is concerned. (b)  If the putative father does not submit to genetic testing, the court shall, without further notice, on the date and time previously set through the notice for hearing, review the documentation of the refusal to submit to genetic testing and make a determination as to whether the complaint to establish paternity should be granted.  The refusal to submit to such testing shall create a rebuttable presumption of an admission to paternity by the putative father. (c)  In any case in which the Department of Human Services orders genetic testing, the department is required to advance costs of such tests subject to recoupment from the alleged father if paternity is established.  If either party challenges the original test results, the department shall order additional testing at the expense of the challenging party. (2)  In any case in which paternity has not been established, the court, on its own motion or on motion of the plaintiff or the defendant, shall order the mother, the alleged father and the child or children to submit to genetic tests and any other tests which reasonably prove or disprove the probability of paternity.  If paternity has been previously established, the court shall only order genetic testing pursuant to Section 93-9-10. If any party refuses to submit to such tests, the court may resolve the question of paternity against such party or enforce its order for genetic testing as the rights of others and the interest of justice require. (3)  Any party calling a witness or witnesses for the purpose of testifying that they had sexual intercourse with the mother at any possible time of conception of the child whose paternity is in question shall provide all other parties with the name and address of the witness at least twenty (20) days before the trial.  If a witness is produced at the hearing for the purpose provided in this subsection but the party calling the witness failed to provide the twenty-day notice, the court may adjourn the proceeding for the purpose of taking a genetic test of the witness before hearing the testimony of the witness if the court finds that the party calling the witness acted in good faith. (4)  The court shall ensure that all parties are aware of their right to request genetic tests under this section. (5)  (a)  Genetic tests shall be performed by a laboratory selected from the approved list as prepared and maintained by the Department of Human Services. (b)  The Department of Human Services shall publicly issue a request for proposals, and such requests for proposals when issued shall contain terms and conditions relating to price, technology and such other matters as are determined by the department to be appropriate for inclusion or required by law.  After responses to the request for proposals have been duly received, the department shall select the lowest and best bid(s) on the basis of price, technology and other relevant factors and from such proposals, but not limited to the terms thereof, negotiate and enter into contract(s) with one or more of the laboratories submitting proposals.  The department shall prepare a list of all laboratories with which it has contracted on these terms.  The list and any updates thereto shall be distributed to all chancery clerks.  To be eligible to appear on the list, a laboratory must meet the following requirements: (i)  The laboratory is qualified to do business within the State of Mississippi; (ii)  The laboratory can provide test results in less than fourteen (14) days; and (iii)  The laboratory must have participated in the competitive procurement process. SECTION 21.  Section 93-5-24, Mississippi Code of 1972, is brought forward as follows: 93-5-24.  (1)  Custody shall be awarded as follows according to the best interests of the child: (a)  Physical and legal custody to both parents jointly pursuant to subsections (2) through (7). (b)  Physical custody to both parents jointly pursuant to subsections (2) through (7) and legal custody to either parent. (c)  Legal custody to both parents jointly pursuant to subsections (2) through (7) and physical custody to either parent. (d)  Physical and legal custody to either parent. (e)  Upon a finding by the court that both of the parents of the child have abandoned or deserted such child or that both such parents are mentally, morally or otherwise unfit to rear and train the child the court may award physical and legal custody to: (i)  The person in whose home the child has been living in a wholesome and stable environment; or (ii)  Physical and legal custody to any other person deemed by the court to be suitable and able to provide adequate and proper care and guidance for the child. In making an order for custody to either parent or to both parents jointly, the court, in its discretion, may require the parents to submit to the court a plan for the implementation of the custody order. (2)  Joint custody may be awarded where irreconcilable differences is the ground for divorce, in the discretion of the court, upon application of both parents. (3)  In other cases, joint custody may be awarded, in the discretion of the court, upon application of one or both parents. (4)  There shall be a presumption that joint custody is in the best interest of a minor child where both parents have agreed to an award of joint custody. (5)  (a)  For the purposes of this section, "joint custody" means joint physical and legal custody. (b)  For the purposes of this section, "physical custody" means those periods of time in which a child resides with or is under the care and supervision of one (1) of the parents. (c)  For the purposes of this section, "joint physical custody" means that each of the parents shall have significant periods of physical custody.  Joint physical custody shall be shared by the parents in such a way so as to assure a child of frequent and continuing contact with both parents. (d)  For the purposes of this section, "legal custody" means the decision-making rights, the responsibilities and the authority relating to the health, education and welfare of a child. (e)  For the purposes of this section, "joint legal custody" means that the parents or parties share the decision-making rights, the responsibilities and the authority relating to the health, education and welfare of a child.  An award of joint legal custody obligates the parties to exchange information concerning the health, education and welfare of the minor child, and to confer with one another in the exercise of decision-making rights, responsibilities and authority. An award of joint physical and legal custody obligates the parties to exchange information concerning the health, education and welfare of the minor child, and unless allocated, apportioned or decreed, the parents or parties shall confer with one another in the exercise of decision-making rights, responsibilities and authority. (6)  Any order for joint custody may be modified or terminated upon the petition of both parents or upon the petition of one (1) parent showing that a material change in circumstances has occurred. (7)  There shall be no presumption that it is in the best interest of a child that a mother be awarded either legal or physical custody. (8)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, access to records and information pertaining to a minor child, including, but not limited to, medical, dental and school records, shall not be denied to a parent because the parent is not the child's custodial parent. (9)  (a)  (i)  In every proceeding where the custody of a child is in dispute, there shall be a rebuttable presumption that it is detrimental to the child and not in the best interest of the child to be placed in sole custody, joint legal custody or joint physical custody of a parent who has a history of perpetrating family violence.  The court may find a history of perpetrating family violence if the court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, one (1) incident of family violence that has resulted in serious bodily injury to, or a pattern of family violence against, the party making the allegation or a family household member of either party.  The court shall make written findings to document how and why the presumption was or was not triggered. (ii)  This presumption may only be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence. (iii)  In determining whether the presumption set forth in subsection (9) has been overcome, the court shall consider all of the following factors: 1.  Whether the perpetrator of family violence has demonstrated that giving sole or joint physical or legal custody of a child to the perpetrator is in the best interest of the child because of the other parent's absence, mental illness, substance abuse or such other circumstances which affect the best interest of the child or children; 2.  Whether the perpetrator has successfully completed a batterer's treatment program; 3.  Whether the perpetrator has successfully completed a program of alcohol or drug abuse counseling if the court determines that counseling is appropriate; 4.  Whether the perpetrator has successfully completed a parenting class if the court determines the class to be appropriate; 5.  If the perpetrator is on probation or parole, whether he or she is restrained by a protective order granted after a hearing, and whether he or she has complied with its terms and conditions; and 6.  Whether the perpetrator of domestic violence has committed any further acts of domestic violence. (iv)  The court shall make written findings to document how and why the presumption was or was not rebutted. (b)  (i)  If custody is awarded to a suitable third person, it shall not be until the natural grandparents of the child have been excluded and such person shall not allow access to a violent parent except as ordered by the court. (ii)  If the court finds that both parents have a history of perpetrating family violence, but the court finds that parental custody would be in the best interest of the child, custody may be awarded solely to the parent less likely to continue to perpetrate family violence.  In such a case, the court may mandate completion of a treatment program by the custodial parent. (c)  If the court finds that the allegations of domestic violence are completely unfounded, the chancery court shall order the alleging party to pay all court costs and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by the defending party in responding to such allegations. (d)  (i)  A court may award visitation by a parent who committed domestic or family violence only if the court finds that adequate provision for the safety of the child and the parent who is a victim of domestic or family violence can be made. (ii)  In a visitation order, a court may take any of the following actions: 1.  Order an exchange of the child to occur in a protected setting; 2.  Order visitation supervised in a manner to be determined by the court; 3.  Order the perpetrator of domestic or family violence to attend and complete to the satisfaction of the court a program of intervention for perpetrators or other designated counseling as a condition of visitation; 4.  Order the perpetrator of domestic or family violence to abstain from possession or consumption of alcohol or controlled substances during the visitation and for twenty-four (24) hours preceding the visitation; 5.  Order the perpetrator of domestic or family violence to pay a fee to defray the cost of supervised visitation; 6.  Prohibit overnight visitation; 7.  Require a bond from the perpetrator of domestic or family violence for the return and safety of the child; or 8.  Impose any other condition that is deemed necessary to provide for the safety of the child, the victim of family or domestic violence, or other family or household member. (iii)  Whether or not visitation is allowed, the court may order the address of the child or the victim of family or domestic violence to be kept confidential. (e)  The court may refer but shall not order an adult who is a victim of family or domestic violence to attend counseling relating to the victim's status or behavior as a victim, individually or with the perpetrator of domestic or family violence, as a condition of receiving custody of a child or as a condition of visitation. (f)  If a court allows a family or household member to supervise visitation, the court shall establish conditions to be followed during visitation. SECTION 22.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.